Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 14 Shellfish Packing Houses

21-14-1.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, the following definitions apply to this chapter:

“Approved” means approved by the director.

“Department” means the department of health.

“Director” means the director of health or the director’s duly appointed agents.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, association, or private or municipal corporation.

“Polluted area” means and includes any shellfish grounds underlying waters which have been examined and found to be unfit for the production of shellfish for human consumption.

“Processing” means and includes cleansing, mixing, opening, or packing shellfish which are to be offered for sale or sold.

“Shellfish” means and includes oysters, mussels, and all varieties of clams.

“Shellfish business” means and includes one of the following: processing, labeling, storing except in commercial warehouses, or transporting except by common carrier shellfish which are to be offered for sale or sold.

“Shellfish grounds” means and includes all lands underlying waters within the rise and fall of the tide and the marine limits of the jurisdiction of the state.

“Taking” means and includes gathering, digging, raking, tonging, or dredging of shellfish.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 3.

21-14-2.
License for shellfish business.

No person shall conduct within this state any shellfish business until that person shall have obtained a license from the department. The director shall, upon receipt of application for a license to conduct a shellfish business, cause the applicant’s shellfish business facilities to be investigated and, if they are found to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter, shall issue a license upon receipt of a fee for a shipper/reshipper or for a shucker packer/repacker as set forth in §

23-1-54

. Any license issued shall apply only to those phases of the shellfish business that appear on the license and are defined by the director in regulations he or she shall adopt in regard to licensing. In order to set the license renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment can be combined on one license instead of on several licenses, the department of health shall set the license renewal date. The license period shall be for twelve (12) months, unless sooner suspended or revoked for cause, commencing on the license renewal date, and the license fee shall be at the full annual rate regardless of the date of application or the date of issuance of license. If the license renewal date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of licensed establishments, not to exceed the annual license fee, in order to implement the change in license renewal date. Licenses issued pursuant to this section may be suspended or revoked for violation of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter. The director may, after a hearing, refuse to issue any shellfish business license to any person who has been convicted of any violation of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 2; P.L. 1948; ch. 2039, § 2; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-2

; P.L. 1978, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 53, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 94. § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 39; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 32.

21-14-3.
Sanitary regulations.

The director shall adopt any regulations regarding sanitation as he or she shall deem necessary with reference to the conduct of a shellfish business. The director shall also adopt any regulations as he or she deems necessary to assure the sanitary quality of shellfish brought into this state for sale in this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 206, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 577, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 233, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 3; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-3

.

21-14-4 — 21-14-8.
Repealed.

21-14-9.
Sale of noncomplying shellfish prohibited — Confiscation — Search warrants.

No person shall sell or possess with intent to sell within this state for human consumption any shellfish which have not been taken, processed, labeled, transported, or sold in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter. Any shellfish which the director shall have reasonable cause to believe have been taken from polluted areas or which have not been taken, processed, labeled, transported, or sold in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter shall be confiscated. Search warrants may be issued by any district court upon complaint of the director or the director’s duly authorized agents relating to violations of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 5; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-9

.

21-14-10.
Markets exempt from chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to wholesale or retail markets offering for sale only shellfish which have been obtained from persons licensed to operate shellfish establishments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 206, § 8; P.L. 1910, ch. 577, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 233, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 6; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-10

.

21-14-11.
Enforcement — Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter and to prosecute all persons guilty of violations of them. In all prosecutions pursuant to this section the director shall not be required to enter into any recognizance nor to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1222, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 206, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 206, § 14; P.L. 1910, ch. 577, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 233, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 9; G.L., ch. 234, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-11

.

21-14-12.
Inspection of business premises — Dockside program established.

The director shall make regular inspections of the business premises of licensees and no person shall interfere with or obstruct the entrance of the director to any packing house or structural appurtenance to it, vessel, or vehicle for the purpose of making inspection as to sanitary conditions during reasonable business hours, and no person shall obstruct the conduct of this inspection; provided, that inspections as to sanitary conditions shall be made only by the director or employees of the department. These employees of the department shall not be construed to include agents whom the director may appoint in other departments for the purpose of enforcing other provisions of this chapter; and provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed as having granted to the director or any duly authorized official of the department the right of search and seizure without a warrant.

The director shall be authorized to establish a dockside program, including the promulgation of any rules and regulations deemed necessary or advisable in connection therewith, pursuant to the relevant provisions of the National Shellfish Sanitation Program (NSSP) Model Ordinance. Promulgating rules and regulations pursuant to the NSSP Model Ordinance shall ensure that the marine shellfish processers, licensed by the department to land and process surf clams and/or other marine shellfish species acquired in federal waters, are doing so in sanitary fashion that comports with national standards. The rules and regulations shall also be consistent with the landing permit requirements of the department of environmental management in §

20-2.1-7

. The dockside program shall not apply to aquaculture processers.

The licensing fees from the dockside program shall be deposited into the general fund. However, the amount of the revenues collected for the dockside program shall be appropriated to the department of health for its administration of this program. The director shall have the authority to establish the licensing fees and limit the number of licenses issued, at his or her sole discretion.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-12

; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 9, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 10, effective June 28, 2022.

21-14-13.
Appointment of enforcement agents.

The director may appoint as his or her agents any subordinate officers and employees in the department that may to him or her seem desirable and may assign to these agents the functions vested in the department for the preservation and enforcement of sanitary regulations in and around shellfish packing houses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 9; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-13

; impl. am. P.L. 1965, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 3.

21-14-14.
Powers of enforcement agents.

All agents appointed pursuant to §

21-14-13

, by virtue of their appointment and until these appointments shall be cancelled and revoked, may seize all shellfish in possession of any person violating the provisions of this chapter, and may make complaints for the violations, and in any complaint they shall not be required at the time of complaint or after this to enter into recognizance or in any way to become liable for the costs that may accrue on the complaint.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 9; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-14

; P.L. 1964, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 3.

21-14-15.
Penalties for violations.

Persons convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter shall be punished:

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months or by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense;

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense; and

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for a third or subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1222, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 206, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 106, § 13; P.L. 1910, ch. 577, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 233, § 8; G. L. 1938, ch. 234, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 9; P.L. 1948, ch. 2039, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 234, § 10; P.L. 1953, ch. 3149, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-14-15

; P.L. 1964, ch. 61, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 263, § 3.